Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-205 Insurance independently
procured; duty to report and pay tax. (a) Nothing in this part shall
prohibit a person from independently procuring, continuing, or renewing
insurance from an insurer which is not authorized to transact insurance in this
State.

(b) Each insured who in this State, before
July 1, 2011, procures, continues, or renews surplus lines insurance on a risk
located or to be performed in whole in this State, other than insurance
procured through a surplus lines broker pursuant to part III
of this article shall file within sixty days after the date the insurance was
procured, continued, or renewed, a written report with the commissioner. Each
insured who in this State, after June 30, 2011, procures, continues, or renews
surplus lines insurance for which this State is the home state of the insured,
other than insurance procured through a surplus lines broker pursuant to part
III of this article shall file within forty-five days after the end of the
calendar quarter in which the insurance was procured, continued, or renewed, a
written report with the commissioner. The report shall be on forms prescribed
by the commissioner, showing:

(1) The name and address of the insured or insureds;

(2) The name and address of the insurer;

(3) The subject of the insurance;

(4) A general description of the coverage;

(5) The itemized amount of premiums, taxes, and fees
currently charged for each state;

(6) The policy number, effective date of the policy,
and home state of the insured; and

(7) Other additional, pertinent information requested
by the commissioner.

(c) Gross premiums charged for the surplus
lines insurance allocable to this State, less any return premiums, are subject
to a tax at the rate of 4.68 per cent. At the time of filing the report
required in subsection (b) for insurance procured, continued, or renewed before
July 1, 2011, the insured shall pay the tax to the commissioner. At the time
of filing the report required in subsection (b) for insurance procured,
continued, or renewed after June 30, 2011, if this State is the home state of
the insured, the insured shall pay the tax and fees of this State and all other
states to the director of finance, through the commissioner. If this State is
not the home state of the insured, the insured shall pay the tax and fees of
this State to the home state of the insured.

As used in this subsection, "gross
premiums" means the amount of the policy or coverage premium charged by
the insurer in consideration for the insurance contract. Any charges for
policy, survey, inspection, service, or similar fees or other charges added by
the broker shall not be considered part of gross premiums.

(d) If an independently procured policy covers
risks or exposures only partially located or to be performed in this State, the
tax payable shall be computed on the portion of the premium properly
attributable to the risks or exposures located or to be performed in this
State.

(e) Delinquent taxes shall bear interest at
the rate of ten per cent per annum.

(f) This section does not abrogate or modify,
and shall not be construed or deemed to abrogate or modify, any provision of
section 431:8-202 or any other provision of this code.

(g) This section shall not apply to life
insurance, accident and health or sickness insurance, or annuities. [L 1987, c
348, §15; am L 1989, c 195, §21; am L 2003, c 212, §44; am L 2006, c 154, §5;
am L 2011, c 68, §7]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next